test/tools/fsmbook-examples/FinnishProsody/FinnishProsody.hfst.script
TOOLDIR=../../../../tools/src/

# The data

echo "kalastelet
kalasteleminen
ilmoittautuminen
järjestelemättömyydestänsä
kalastelemme
ilmoittautumisesta
järjestelmällisyydelläni
järjestelmällistämätöntä
voimisteluttelemasta
opiskelija
opettamassa
kalastelet
strukturalismi
onnittelemanikin
mäki
perijä
repeämä
ergonomia
puhelimellani
matematiikka
puhelimistani
rakastajattariansa
kuningas
kainostelijat
ravintolat
merkonomin" | $TOOLDIR/hfst-strings2fst -f $1 -j > FinnWords.hfst


# Some definitions:

echo "[u | y | i]" | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > HighV                       # High vowel
echo "[e | o | ö]" | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > MidV                        # Mid vowel
echo "[a | ä]" | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > LowV                            # Low vowel
echo '[ @"HighV" | @"MidV" | @"LowV" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > USV    # Unstressed Vowel

echo "[ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p "\
     "| q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ]" | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > C     # Consonant

echo '[á | é | í | ó | ú | ý | "ä&#769;" | "ö&#769;"]' \
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > MSV
echo '[à | è | ì | ò | ù | "y&#768;" | "ä&#768;" | "ö&#768;"]' \
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > SSV
echo '[ @"MSV" | @"SSV" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > SV                  # Stressed vowel
echo '[ @"USV" | @"SV" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > V                    # Vowel

echo '[ @"V" | @"C" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > P                       # Phone

echo '[[\@"P"+] | .#.]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > B                      # Boundary
echo '[.#. | "."]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > E                           # Edge
echo '[~$"." "." ~$"."]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > SB                    # At most one syllable boundary

echo '[ @"C"* @"V" ]'| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > Light                     # Light syllable
echo '[ @"Light" @"P"+ ]'| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > Heavy                 # Heavy syllable

echo '[ @"Heavy" | @"Light" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > S               # Syllable
echo '[ @"S" & $@"SV" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > SS                    # Stressed syllable
echo '[ @"S" & ~@"SV" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > US                    # Unstressed syllable
echo '[ @"S" & $@"MSV" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > MSS                  # Syllable with main stress

echo '[ @"S" "." @"S" ]' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > BF                    # Binary foot


# Rules for prosody:

echo '[ [. .] -> "." || [ @"HighV" | @"MidV" ]'\
  '_ @"LowV",'\
  'i _ [@"MidV" - e],'\
  'u _ [@"MidV" - o],'\
  'y _ [@"MidV" - ö] ]'\
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > MarkNonDiphtongs      # y.e

# The general syllabification rule has exceptions. In particular, loan
# words such as ate.isti 'atheist' must be partially syllabified in the
# lexicon.

echo ' @"C"*  @"V"+ @"C"* @-> ... "." || _ @"C" @"V" ' \
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > Syllabify

echo ' @"BF" "." @"Light" @-> "(" ... ")" '\
     '// [{).} | .#.] [@"BF" "."]*  _'\
     '["." @"Heavy" "." @"S" ] | .#. ' \
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > TernaryFeet

# Scan all the unfooted material into binary feet.

echo ' @"BF" @-> "(" ... ")" || .#.|"." _ .#.|"." ' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > BinaryFeet

# Assign the primary stress to the first vowel of the first syllable.

echo ' a -> á, e -> é, i -> í, o -> ó,'\
     'u -> ú, y -> ý, ä -> "ä´", ö -> "ö´" || .#. "(" @"C"* _' \
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > MainStress

# Assign secondary stress to all initial vowels of non-initial syllables.

echo ' a -> à, e -> è, i -> ì, o -> ò,'\
     'u -> ù, y -> "y`", ä -> "ä`", ö -> "ö`"'\
     '|| "(" @"C"* _ ' | $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > SecondaryStress

# Assign an optional secondary stress to an unfooted final syllable
# if it is heavy.

echo 'a (->) à, e (->) è, i (->) ì,'\
     'o (->) ò, u (->) ù, y (->) "y`",'\
     'ä (->) "ä`", ö (->) "ö`" || "." @"C"* _ @"P" .#. ' \
| $TOOLDIR/hfst-regexp2fst -f $1 > OptFinalStress


# Calculate the composition of rules from =MarkNonDiphtongs= to =OptFinalStress=
# and compose the lexicon with the composition of rules.

cp MarkNonDiphtongs Rules;
for i in
  Syllabify \
  TernaryFeet \
  BinaryFeet \
  MainStress \
  SecondaryStress \
  OptFinalStress; \
do
  cat Rules | $TOOLDIR/hfst-compose $i > TMP;
  mv TMP Rules;
done

cat FinnWords | $TOOLDIR/hfst-compose Rules > FinnProsody

# Print the lexicon with prosody indicated.
# cat FinnProsody | $TOOLDIR/hfst-project -p output | $TOOLDIR/hfst-fst2strings
